Arkansas, session 2025, HB1214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-10-702 is amended to read as follows:
20-10-702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “General nursing experience” means nursing experience
obtained through employment, internship, externship, or other means and
includes without limitation employment in a nursing assistant education
program or employment in or supervision of nursing students in a nursing
facility or unit, a geriatrics department excluding a geriatric psychiatry
department, a long-term acute care hospital, home healthcare, hospice care,
or other long-term care setting;
(2) “Long-term care facility” means a nursing home, a
residential care facility, an assisted living facility, an adult daycare
facility, or any other facility which provides long-term medical or personal
care; and
(2)(3) “Primary instructor” means a registered nurse who:
(A)(i) Is licensed in this state; or
*JMB151*
01/23/2025 1:29:25 PM JMB151

HB1214
(ii) Holds a multistate privilege to practice if the
registered nurse moves from a state that has joined the Interstate Nurse
Licensure Compact, §17-87-601 et seq., to Arkansas and meets all requirements
for licensure in Arkansas;
(B) Does not have any disciplinary action regarding his or
her license by the licensing entity or authority; and
(C)(i) Possesses a minimum of two (2) years' general
nursing experience as a registered nurse including at least one (1) year of
long-term care nursing services in a nursing facility setting within the last
five (5) ten (10) years; and
(D) Annually attends an eight (8) hour class authorized by
the Department of Human Services regarding updates to applicable laws and
rules, best practices, and common issues encountered in long-term care
facilities.
(ii) As used in this section, “general nursing
experience” may include without limitation employment in a nursing assistant
education program or employment in or supervision of nursing students in a
nursing facility or unit, geriatrics department excluding a geriatric
psychiatry department, long-term acute care hospital, home healthcare,
hospice care, or other long-term care setting.
















01/23/2025 1:29:25 PM JMB151